Utah statutes.
53B-8c-104.   Notice of tuition waiver approval -- Annual appropriation.
(1)  Upon receiving an application under Subsection 53B-8c-103(1)(c), the
department shall determine whether the applicant and the courses for which
tuition waiver is sought meet the requirements of Section 53B-8c-103 and, if
so, shall approve the application and notify the higher education institution
that the application has been approved.
(2)  The department shall provide the necessary forms and applications and
cooperate with the state's institutions of higher education in developing
efficient procedures for the implementation of this chapter.
(3)  The department shall annually report to the Legislature's Higher
Education Appropriations Subcommittee on the number of individuals for whom
tuition has been waived at each institution and the total amounts paid under
this chapter for the fiscal year.
(4)  The Legislature may annually appropriate the funds necessary to implement
this chapter, including moneys to offset the tuition waivers at each
institution.
